Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.220

Preemptive rights of shareholders to acquire unissued shares—Articles of incorporation may limit or permit—Later acquisition.

The articles of incorporation of any bank organized under this title may limit or permit the preemptive rights of a shareholder to acquire unissued shares of the corporation and may thereafter by amendment limit, deny, or grant to shareholders of any class of stock the preemptive right to acquire additional shares of the corporation whether then or thereafter authorized.

[ 2014 c 37 s 187; 1979 c 106 s 8. Formerly RCW 30.12.220.]